Washington statutes.
RCW 9.35.800

Application of Consumer Protection Act.

The legislature finds that the practices covered by RCW 9.35.010 and 9.35.020 are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Violations of RCW 9.35.010 or 9.35.020 are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of RCW 9.35.010 or 9.35.020 is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

Nothing in RCW 9.35.010 or 9.35.020 limits a victim's ability to receive treble damages under RCW 19.86.090.

[ 2001 c 217 s 7.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2001 c 217: See note following RCW 9.35.005.